District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.93

Repealed

Duties and functions of Mayor.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 301, Pub. L. 87-569, § 93
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(hh), 25 DCR 5740
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 431(c), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.93.
1981 Ed., § 29-594.
1973 Ed., § 29-1093.